Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Lien of Judgment and Enforcement by Execution

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

30 Am. Jur. 2d Executions and Enforcement of Judgments §§ 113 to 204.

Right of vendee under executory land contract to lien for amount paid on purchase price as against subsequent creditors of purchasers from vendor, 82 ALR3d 1040.

Judgment lien or levy of execution on one joint tenant's share or interest as severing joint tenancy, 51 ALR4th 906.

33 C.J.S. Executions §§ 18 to 55, 123 to 138; 49 C.J.S. Judgments §§ 454 to 511.

§ 1-17-301.
Property subject to execution.

Except for property exempt
by law, all property of the judgment debtor, both real and personal
or any legal or equitable interest therein including any interest
of the judgment debtor in mortgaged property or property being sold
under an executory land contract, is subject to execution.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 381; R.S. 1887, § 2721; R.S. 1899, § 3828; C.S. 1910, § 4683; C.S. 1920, § 5956; R.S. 1931, § 89-2916; C.S. 1945, § 39-4201; W.S. 1957, § 1-357; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-301; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to sale and redemption of realty, see chapter 18 of this title.

As to property exempt from execution or attachment, see chapter 20 of this title and cross references thereunder.

As to when proceeds of wrongful death judgment may not be used to pay debts of decedent, see §

1-38-102

.

As to attachment of goods covered by negotiable instruments, see § 34.1-7-602.

After-acquired lands. —

A judgment of the district court constitutes a lien on after-acquired lands of the judgment debtor. Coad v. Cowhick, 9 Wyo. 316, 63 P. 584,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 66 P. 597 (Wyo. 1901).

Beneficial interests. —

An entryman on public land held to have the full beneficial interest which, under this section and §

1-17-302

, was subject to a judgment recovered before issuance of patent. Muir v. Bosey, 23 Wyo. 46, 146 P. 595,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1915).

Execution where lien has expired. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-17-336

does not state that the judgment creditor's rights to execute on the debtor's property expire. Instead, it states that, if there is no execution within a year, the judgment ceases to operate a lien. Thus, even if their lien had expired, the judgment creditors could still execute on the debtor's property and a conveyance of the property by the debtor was fraudulent. Dev-Tech Corp. v. Wilson, Miller, Barton & Peek, Inc., 2004 WY 163, 102 P.3d 880,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 2004).

Although execution was not levied within one year of the filing of foreign judgments, which meant that the judgments were no longer liens under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-17-336

, the property remained available for execution pursuant to this section.
Cook v. Swires, 2009 WY 21, 202 P.3d 397,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Bummer v. Collier, 864 P.2d 453,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1919); Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68,

1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581

(10th Cir. 1974).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Vendee's interest under executory contract as subject to execution, 1 ALR2d 727.

Property of nongovernmental charity as subject to execution under judgment for damages in tort, 25 ALR2d 29.

Solid mineral royalty as real or personal property for purposes of execution, 68 ALR2d 732.

Interest of spouse in estate by the entirety as subject to execution for individual debt, 75 ALR2d 1172.

Inadequacy of price as basis for setting aside execution or sheriff's sale — modern cases, 5 ALR4th 794.

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

§ 1-17-302.
When lien attaches to property; generally.

The lands and tenements
within the county in which judgment is entered are bound for the satisfaction
thereof from the day the judgment is filed with the county clerk.
Whenever a judgment is required to be filed with the county clerk,
it shall be recorded in the real estate records. Goods and chattels
of the debtor are bound from the time they are seized in execution.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 382; R.S. 1887, § 2722; R.S. 1899, § 3829; C.S. 1910, § 4684; C.S. 1920, § 5957; R.S. 1931, § 89-2917; C.S. 1945, § 3-4202; W.S. 1957, § 1-358; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-302; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to judgments by confession generally, see §§

1-16-201

and

1-16-202

.

Equitable interest not “land and tenement.” —

The statutory phrase “lands and tenements” is not broad enough to encompass the equitable interest of the buyer under a contract for deed. In re Estate of Ventling, 771 P.2d 388,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1989).

A judgment in and of itself does not necessarily constitute a lien

upon any property unless made so by statute. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

“Rendition” of judgment distinguished from “entry.” —

Rendition of a judgment is the judicial act of the court in pronouncing the sentence of the law on the facts in controversy, as distinguished from entry, which is the clerical act of spreading the judgment on the record. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

A writ of attachment creates a lien as of the date of service.

United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

A garnishment is virtually a process of attachment,

and a garnishee is bound from the time of service. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

And it gives the creditor a paramount right,

although not necessarily title, to property as a security for his demand. United States v. Hunt, 373 F. Supp. 1079, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9269 (D. Wyo. 1974), aff'd, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1975).

Action against grantee of deceased judgment debtor. —

Petition in an action against grantee of deceased judgment debtor is an action to enforce a judgment lien. Stephenson v. Lichtenstein, 24 Wyo. 417, 160 P. 1170,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1916).

Bona fide purchaser

without notice who buys from fraudulent grantee can hold against fraudulent grantor's creditors. Snyder v. Ryan, 39 Wyo. 266, 270 P. 1072,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 266, 275 P. 127,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1929).

Judgment creditor could not have debtor's conveyances set aside as fraudulent after property passed into hands of innocent purchaser. Snyder v. Ryan, 39 Wyo. 266, 270 P. 1072,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 266, 275 P. 127,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1929).

Disclosure of claim. —

Finding in favor of the judgment lien creditor in the bank's action involving mortgage priority was improper where the record did not support the district court's conclusion that a reasonable inquiry would have disclosed any claim by the creditor to the tracts, but the court remanded to the district court for consideration of the effect of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-17-302

(repealed in part by 1999 Wyo. Sess. Laws ch. 190, § 1) on the judgment lien creditor's claim. Wyo. Bank & Trust v. Haught, 2003 WY 111, 76 P.3d 301,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

United States v. Hunt, 513 F.2d 129, 1975 U.S. App. LEXIS 15543 (10th Cir. 1975).

Quoted

in

Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Davis, 770 P.2d 215,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1989).

Stated

in

Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. 1974).

Cited

in

Coad v. Cowhick, 9 Wyo. 316, 63 P. 584,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1901); Muir v. Bosey, 23 Wyo. 46, 146 P. 595,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1915); Bachmann v. Hurtt, 26 Wyo. 332, 184 P. 709,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1919); In re Estate of Hite, 829 P.2d 1173,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1992); Patel v. Cwcapital Asset Mgmt., Llc, 2010 WY 147, 242 P.3d 1015,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Nov. 16, 2010)..

Law reviews. —

See “Creditors' Rights Under the Recording Statutes,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 73.

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-303.
When lien attaches to property; judgment of supreme court.

A judgment of the supreme
court for money binds the lands and tenements of the debtor within
the county in which the suit originated from the day the judgment
is filed with the county clerk. Whenever a judgment is required to
be filed with the county clerk, it shall be recorded in the real estate
records. Goods and chattels of the debtor are bound from the time
they are seized in execution. The lien of a judgment of the district
court which is appealed to the supreme court shall not be divested
or vacated, but shall continue until the final determination of the
action in the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 383; R.S. 1887, § 2723; R.S. 1899, § 3830; C.S. 1910, § 4685; C.S. 1920, § 5958; R.S. 1931, § 89-2918; C.S. 1945, § 3-4203; W.S. 1957, § 1-359; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-303; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 1-17-304.
Recording lien on real estate in other counties.

The judgment creditor
in any judgment rendered by any district court in this state, or in
any judgment rendered in a circuit court of this state and filed in
the judgment record of the district court, may file a transcript of
the judgment record of the district court with the clerk of the district
court and the county clerk in any other counties within this state
where the judgment debtor owns real estate. The judgment is a lien
upon all real estate of the judgment debtor in any county in which
the transcript is filed with the clerk of district court and the county
clerk from the date of filing with the county clerk. The clerk of
the district court of any county in which the transcript is filed
shall enter the judgment upon the judgment records of the court in
the same manner as judgments are rendered in that court.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 22, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4614; R.S. 1931, § 89-3011; C.S. 1945, § 3-4204; W.S. 1957, § 1-360; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-304; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Issuing execution. —

The clerk of court where judgment is filed has no power to issue execution, but court of county where judgment was rendered should issue the execution. Wyoming Cent. Irrigation Co. v. Laporte, 26 Wyo. 522, 188 P. 360,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1920).

Quoted

in

Barnhart Drilling Co. v. Petroleum Fin., Inc., 807 P.2d 411,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1991).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-305.
Lien of judgments of federal courts.

Judgments and decrees entered in any United States district court or circuit court held within this state are a lien against the lands and tenements of the person against whom the judgment or decree is rendered, situated within the county where the judgment or decree is entered, from the day the judgment is filed with the county clerk.

The judgment creditor in any judgment or decree rendered in any United States district court within this state may file a transcript of the judgment record in the office of the clerk of any Wyoming district court and the county clerk in any counties in the state of Wyoming where the judgment debtor owns real estate.

The clerk of the district court of any county in which the transcript is filed shall enter the judgment upon the judgment records of the court in the same manner as judgments rendered in that court.

The judgment or decree is a lien upon all the real estate of the judgment debtor in the county or counties where the transcript is filed with the clerk of district court and the county clerk from the date of filing with the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 41, §§ 1 to 3; 1929, ch. 10, §§ 1 to 4; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3012 to 89-3015; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4205 to 3-4208; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-361 to 1-364; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-305; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
92.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 1-17-306.
Lien of judgments of circuit courts.

The party in whose favor a judgment is rendered by a circuit court if the judgment is not appealed or stayed, may file with the clerk of the district court and the county clerk of the county in which the judgment was rendered a transcript thereof, certifying therein the amount paid thereon, if any. The clerk of court shall enter the case on the execution docket, together with the amount of the judgment and the time of filing the transcript with the county clerk. If within ten (10) days after the judgment was rendered, the judgment debtor pays the same or gives bond for stay of execution, the justice shall immediately certify that fact to the clerk of the district court and the county clerk. The district court clerk shall enter a memorandum thereof upon the docket. The cost of the transcript, the filing, recording and the entry on the docket shall be paid by the party who files and records the transcript and not be taxed to the other party.

The judgment shall be a lien on the real estate of the judgment debtor within the county from the day the transcript is filed with the county clerk provided the transcript has also been filed previously or that same day with the clerk of district court.

Execution may be issued on the judgment at any time after filing the transcript as if the judgment had been rendered in the district court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 384 to 386; R.S. 1887, §§ 2724 to 2726; R.S. 1899, §§ 3831 to 3833; C.S. 1910, §§ 4686 to 4688; C.S. 1920, §§ 5959 to 5961; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-2919 to 89-2921; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4209 to 3-4211; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-365 to 1-367; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-306; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-17-307.
When judgment becomes dormant.

If execution on a judgment
rendered in any court of record in this state or a transcript of which
has been filed as provided in W.S. 1-17-306(a) is not issued within five (5) years from date of the
judgment or if five (5) years intervene between the date the last
execution issued on the judgment and the time of issuing another execution
thereon, the judgment is dormant and ceases to operate as a lien on
the estate of the judgment debtor.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 387; R.S. 1887, § 2727; R.S. 1899, § 3834; C.S. 1910, § 4689; C.S. 1920, § 5962; R.S. 1931, § 89-2922; C.S. 1945, § 3-4212; W.S. 1957, § 1-368; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-307.

Cross references. —

As to revival of dormant judgments, see §§

1-16-501

to

1-16-506

.

Waiting period questionable where bankruptcy petition filed.
—

There are no irregularities where a creditor waits approximately one and a half years from judgment to seek a writ of execution, but when coupled with the timing of the filing of a bankruptcy petition approximately 68 days after delivery of the writ to the sheriff, this waiting period is questionable. In re Cockreham, 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

False entries. —

An attorney who makes false entries for the purpose of keeping a judgment alive should be suspended from practice. State Bd. of Law Examiners v. Strahan, 44 Wyo. 156, 8 P.2d 1090,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 487, 13 P.2d 1083,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1932).

Child support payments. —

Where a mother did not execute on periodic child support payments within five years of their becoming due, the judgments became dormant, subject to revival within 21 years. Hollingshead v. Hollingshead, 942 P.2d 1104,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Hammond v. Hammond, 14 P.3d 199,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-308.
Writs of execution; generally.

The writ of execution against the property of the judgment debtor issuing from any court of record shall command the officer to whom it is directed that he shall collect the money specified in the writ from the real and personal property of the debtor.

An execution issued on a judgment rendered against a partnership by its firm name shall operate only on the partnership property.

The amount of the debt, damages and costs for which the judgment is entered shall be endorsed on the execution.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 388; R.S. 1887, § 2728; R.S. 1899, § 3835; C.S. 1910, § 4690; C.S. 1920, § 5963; R.S. 1931, § 89-2923; C.S. 1945, § 3-4213; W.S. 1957, § 1-369; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-308; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Relationship to federal law. —

Unpublished decision:

Because defendant officers seized the horses at plaintiffs'
ranch pursuant to a facially valid writ of execution, they were absolutely immune from suit; it followed, then, that to the extent the officials were shielded by absolute quasi-judicial immunity, plaintiffs'
conspiracy claim failed.
Wilcox v. Magill, 468 Fed. Appx. 849, 2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 5284 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2012).

Execution sales are not for sale of any specified property.

Chittim v. Armco Steel Corp., 407 P.2d 1015,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1965).

Rather, such sales are only for recovery of a designated sum of money.

Chittim v. Armco Steel Corp., 407 P.2d 1015,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1965).

Hence, there needs to be a reasonable degree of accuracy in designating the sum of money to be recovered

for a sale to be considered valid. Chittim v. Armco Steel Corp., 407 P.2d 1015,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1965).

If the money specified in the writ of execution is erroneously stated, it cannot be considered a valid writ

for two reasons. In the first place, it is likely to result in the sale of more of the judgment debtor's property than sound judgment would dictate. In the second place, it prevents the judgment debtor from protecting his property by payment of the correct amount for redemption. Any levy and sale under execution, after a lawful tender of the correct amount due, would be illegal. Chittim v. Armco Steel Corp., 407 P.2d 1015,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1965).

Improper to issue execution to enforce conditional judgment.
—

There can be no writ of execution properly issued to enforce a conditional judgment. Where property is sold pursuant to a writ of execution issued on such a nonexistent judgment, the sale is not conducted in conformity with the Code of Civil Procedure, as required by §

1-17-321

, and should not have to be confirmed by the district court. 2-2-H Ranch Co. v. Simmons, 658 P.2d 68,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1983).

Sheriff's commission. —

Under §

18-3-608

, providing that sheriff shall receive commission on money collected on execution or other process, sheriff is entitled to commission where at execution sale the judgment creditor purchases property for less than the judgment debt, although no money actually changes hands, the purchase price being merely credited upon the judgment and execution. Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1916).

Applied

in

Norman v. Jirdon Agri Chems., Inc. (In re Cockreham), 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Coones v. FDIC, 848 P.2d 783,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inadequacy of price as basis for setting aside execution or sheriff's sale — modern cases, 5 ALR4th 794.

§ 1-17-309.
Writs of execution; preferences.

The officer shall endorse
on every writ of execution the time when he received it. When two
(2) or more writs of execution against the same debtor are delivered
to the officer on the same day, no preference shall be given to either
of the writs. If a sufficient sum of money is not made to satisfy
all executions, the amount made shall be distributed to the several
creditors in proportion to the amount of their respective demands.
In all other cases the writ of execution first delivered to the officer
shall be first satisfied. This section shall not affect any preferable
lien which a judgment on execution issued has on the lands of the
judgment debtor.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 389; R.S. 1887, § 2729; R.S. 1899, § 3836; C.S. 1910, § 4691; C.S. 1920, § 5964; R.S. 1931, § 89-2924; C.S. 1945, § 3-4214; W.S. 1957, § 1-370; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-309; Laws 1999, ch. 190, § 1.

Personal property lien effectuated by delivered writ. —

Recordation of the judgment effectuates a lien on nonexempt real property, but the same is not true where personal property is involved, as Wyoming subscribes to the common-law rule that delivery of the writ of execution to the sheriff of the appropriate county creates an execution lien on personal property of the debtor. In re Cockreham, 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. 1974).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

§ 1-17-310.
Writs of execution; levy.

The officer to whom a
writ of execution is delivered shall proceed immediately to levy the
writ upon the real and personal property of the debtor.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 390; R.S. 1887, § 2730; R.S. 1899, § 3837; C.S. 1910, § 4692; C.S. 1920, § 5965; R.S. 1931, § 89-2925; C.S. 1945, § 3-4215; W.S. 1957, § 1-371; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-310; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Relationship to federal law. —

Unpublished decision:

Because defendant officers seized the horses at plaintiffs'
ranch pursuant to a facially valid writ of execution, they were absolutely immune from suit; it followed, then, that to the extent the officials were shielded by absolute quasi-judicial immunity, plaintiffs'
conspiracy claim failed.
Wilcox v. Magill, 468 Fed. Appx. 849, 2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 5284 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2012).

Applied

in

2-H Ranch Co. v. Simmons, 658 P.2d 68,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1983); Norman v. Jirdon Agri Chems., Inc. (In re Cockreham), 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Permian Corp. v. Armco Steel Corp., 508 F.2d 68, 1974 U.S. App. LEXIS 5581 (10th Cir. 1974).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-311.
Bond for future delivery of property; failure to perform.

When an officer levies
an execution upon any goods and chattels which afterwards remain unsold
for any reasonable cause, the officer may for his own security, take
a bond from the defendant, with security he deems sufficient to the
effect that the property shall be delivered to the officer holding
the execution for the sale of same at the time and place appointed
by the officer, either by notice given in writing to the defendant
in execution or by advertisement printed in a newspaper published
in the county, naming the day and place of sale. If the defendant
fails to deliver the goods and chattels at the time and place mentioned
in the notice or to pay to the officer holding the execution the full
value of the goods and chattels or the amount of the debt and costs,
the bond shall be considered broken and may be proceeded on as in
other cases.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 391; R.S. 1887, § 2731; R.S. 1899, § 3838; C.S. 1910, § 4693; C.S. 1920, § 5966; R.S. 1931, § 89-2926; C.S. 1945, § 3-4216; W.S. 1957, § 1-372; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-311.

§ 1-17-312.
Notice of execution sale.

Unless a private sale
is ordered as provided in W.S.

1-17-314

, the officer who levies execution upon goods and chattels,
shall cause public notice to be given of the time and place of sale
at least ten (10) days before the day of sale. The notice shall be
given by advertisement in a newspaper published in the county or,
if no newspaper is published therein, then in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 392; R.S. 1887, § 2732; R.S. 1899, § 3839; C.S. 1910, § 4694; C.S. 1920, § 5967; R.S. 1931, § 89-2927; C.S. 1945, § 3-4217; W.S. 1957, § 1-373; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-312.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notice generally, see §

1-6-201

et seq. and Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-313.
Alias execution.

When goods and chattels
levied upon by execution cannot be sold for want of bidders or want
of time, the officer who makes the return shall annex to the execution
a true inventory of the goods and chattels remaining unsold. The plaintiff
in execution may have another execution issued, directing the sale
of the property levied upon, but the goods and chattels shall not
be sold unless the time and place of sale is advertised as directed
in W.S.

1-17-312

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 393; R.S. 1887, § 2723; R.S. 1899, § 3840; C.S. 1910, § 4695; C.S. 1920, § 5968; R.S. 1931, § 89-2928; C.S. 1945, § 3-4218; W.S. 1957, § 1-374; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-313.

§ 1-17-314.
Sale to
be at public auction; when private sale authorized.

The court from which
an execution or order of sale issues, on application of either party
with due notice to the adverse party and for good cause, may order
the officer holding the process to sell the goods and chattels at
private sale for cash, specifying the time during which the sale will
continue but not extending beyond the return day of the process. Before
a private sale is made, the court shall order the personal property
appraised by three (3) disinterested persons or a qualified appraiser
and the property shall not be sold for less than two-thirds (2/3)
of the appraised value. Except when a private sale is ordered for
good cause, all sales of goods and chattels shall be at public auction.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 394; R.S. 1887, § 2734; R.S. 1899, § 3841; C.S. 1910, § 4696; C.S. 1920, § 5969; R.S. 1931, § 89-2929; C.S. 1945, § 3-4219; W.S. 1957, § 1-375; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-314; 2011, ch. 16, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that purchase by officer making sale or by appraiser is void, see §

1-17-326

.

For provision exempting officer acting under court order from prohibition as to sale of products at less than cost, see §

40-4-107

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, inserted “or a qualified appraiser.”

Relationship to federal law. —

Unpublished decision:

To the extent defendant officials exceeded the scope of awrit by shipping the horses to South Carolina, absolute immunity did not apply, and although Wyoming law allowed for a private sale, they were still required to retain possession (actual or constructive) until a court authorized such a sale for good cause after due notice given to the adverse party.
Wilcox v. Magill, 468 Fed. Appx. 849, 2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 5284 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2012).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes public sale, 4 ALR2d 575.

§ 1-17-315.
Additional levy.

When a writ is issued
directing the sale of property previously taken in execution, the
officer who issues the writ, if requested, shall add thereto a command
to the officer to whom the writ is directed that if the unsold property
remaining in his hands is insufficient to satisfy the judgment, he
shall levy the same upon lands and tenements or goods and chattels
of the judgment debtor, as the law permits, sufficient to satisfy
the debt.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 395; R.S. 1887, § 2735; R.S. 1899, § 3842; C.S. 1910, § 4697; C.S. 1920, § 5970; R.S. 1931, § 89-2930; C.S. 1945, § 3-4220; W.S. 1957, § 1-376; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-315.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-316.
Appraisement of real property required; exception.

The officer who levies execution upon real property shall designate a qualified appraiser or three (3) disinterested property owners who are residents of the county where the lands taken in execution are situate and administer to the appraiser or to the property owners an oath to view and impartially appraise the value of the property levied upon or any interest of the judgment debtor. The appraiser or the property owners shall return to the officer as soon as possible a signed estimate of the appraised value.

When the officer receives the return, he shall promptly deposit a copy with the clerk of the court from which the writ issued and immediately advertise and sell the real estate or the judgment debtor’s interest as provided by law.

If upon the return it appears that two-thirds (2/3) of the appraised value of the judgment debtor’s interest in the real estate levied upon is sufficient to satisfy the execution with costs, the judgment on which the execution is issued shall not operate as a lien on the residue of the debtor’s estate to the prejudice of any other judgment creditor. Except as expressly authorized by law, no real estate shall be sold for less than two-thirds (2/3) of the appraised value of the judgment debtor’s interest in the property.

All lands the property of persons indebted to the state for any debt or taxes, except for loans authorized by the legislature, shall be sold without appraisal notwithstanding any other provision of law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 396 to 398; R.S. 1887, §§ 2736 to 2738; Laws 1897, ch. 26, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3843 to 3845; C.S. 1910, §§ 4698 to 4700; C.S. 1920, §§ 5971 to 5973; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-2931 to 89-2933; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4221 to 3-4223; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-377 to 1-379; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-316; Laws 1988, ch. 37, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provision that purchase of realty by appraiser is void, see §

1-17-326

.

As to fees of real estate appraisers, see §

1-17-341

.

As to sale and redemption of realty under execution, see chapter 18 of this title.

Sheriff cannot seek reappraisal of property to fit original bid.

2-2-H Ranch Co. v. Simmons, 658 P.2d 68,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1983).

Qualified appraiser. —

The three dollar fee limit in §

1-17-341

does not apply in cases where the services of a qualified appraiser are required to levy execution upon real property. A reasonable appraiser's fee is appropriate. TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994).

Judgment debtor may be charged with the costs of execution.
—

While the authority to charge the judgment debtor with the costs of execution in connection with the levy of execution upon real property is somewhat speculative, there is no question that this is the practice in Wyoming. Lutz v. Schmillen, 915 P.2d 599,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1916).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inadequacy of price as basis for setting aside execution or sheriff's sale — modern cases, 5 ALR4th 794.

Propriety of setting minimum or “upset price” for sale of property at judicial foreclosure, 4 ALR5th 693.

§ 1-17-317.
Official property sold without valuation.

The property of any state,
county or municipal officer levied on for or on account of any money
collected or received by him in his official capacity may be sold
without valuation.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 399; R.S. 1887, § 2739; R.S. 1899, § 3846; C.S. 1910, § 4701; C.S. 1920, § 5974; R.S. 1931, § 89-2934; C.S. 1945, § 3-4224; W.S. 1957, § 1-380; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-317.

§ 1-17-318.
Return on execution; record.

The sheriff shall endorse
his actions on the writ. Immediately upon return of the writ, the
clerk shall record at length in the execution docket or other docket
provided for the purpose all such endorsements and the record shall
be a part of the court record.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 401; R.S. 1887, § 2741; R.S. 1899, § 3848; C.S. 1910, § 4702; C.S. 1920, § 5975; R.S. 1931, § 89-2935; C.S. 1945, § 3-4225; W.S. 1957, § 1-381; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-318.

Return on execution

contained in the record held not to require bill of exceptions for consideration in the supreme court on review. Underwood v. David, 9 Wyo. 178, 61 P. 1012,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1900).

Order quashing execution

on judgment could not be reviewed, in error proceeding, without bill of exceptions in record. Lawer Auto Supply v. Teton Auto Co., 39 Wyo. 14, 269 P. 29,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1928).

§ 1-17-319.
Disposition of nonrealty proceeds.

If the sheriff collects
any part of a judgment by virtue of an execution without the sale
of real estate, he shall pay the same to the judgment creditor or
his attorney. If the execution is fully satisfied, he shall return
it within three (3) days after he has collected the money.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 402; R.S. 1887, § 2742; R.S. 1899, § 3849; C.S. 1910, § 4703; C.S. 1920, § 5976; R.S. 1931, § 89-2936; C.S. 1945, § 3-4226; W.S. 1957, § 1-382; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-319.

Applied

in

Norman v. Jirdon Agri Chems., Inc. (In re Cockreham), 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1916).

§ 1-17-320.
Failure of realty purchaser to pay.

Upon notice and motion
of the officer who makes the sale or of an interested party, the court
from which any execution or order of sale issues shall punish as for
contempt any purchaser of real property who willfully fails to pay
the purchase money.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 403; R.S. 1887, § 2743; R.S. 1899, § 3850; C.S. 1910, § 4704; C.S. 1920, § 5977; R.S. 1931, § 89-2937; C.S. 1945, § 3-4227; W.S. 1957, § 1-383; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-320.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-17-321.
Confirmation of sale of realty and order for deed; disposition of
proceeds.

If upon return of any
writ of execution for the satisfaction of which lands and tenements
have been sold, it is found by the court that the sale was made in
all respects in conformity with the code of civil procedure [this
title], the clerk shall be directed to make an entry in the journal
that the court is satisfied with the legality of the sale and that
the officer, upon expiration of the period of redemption, shall make
a deed to the purchaser for the lands and tenements. The officer may
retain the purchase money until the court examines his proceedings.
He shall then pay the money to the persons entitled as the court may
order.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 404; R.S. 1887, § 2744; R.S. 1899, § 3851; C.S. 1910, § 4705; C.S. 1920, § 5978; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 94; R.S. 1931, § 89-2938; C.S. 1945, § 3-4228; W.S. 1957, § 1-384; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-18-321.

Cross references. —

For provision that certificate or deed may be executed by successor in office, see §

1-17-329

.

As to redemption, see §§

1-18-103

to

1-18-106

.

Jurisdiction after term. —

District court could determine claim to proceeds of homestead after expiration of term at which sale was confirmed. Altman v. District Court of Second Judicial Dist., 36 Wyo. 290, 254 P. 691,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1927).

Sale to enforce conditional judgment not in conformity with
code. —

There can be no writ of execution properly issued to enforce a conditional judgment. Where property is sold pursuant to a writ of execution issued on such a nonexistent judgment, the sale is not conducted in conformity with the Code of Civil Procedure, as required by this section, and should not have to be confirmed by the district court. 2-2-H Ranch Co. v. Simmons, 658 P.2d 68,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1983).

Objection to confirmation

of sale on mortgage foreclosure is properly raised by appearing at time order is entered or by motion to vacate, and objections to sale and confirmation must be seasonable and specific. Grieve v. Huber, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1930).

In the confirmation of the sale on mortgage foreclosure, objections to the sale and confirmation must be seasonable and specific. Lutz v. Schmillen, 915 P.2d 599,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Standard of review. —

The standard the Supreme Court applies in its review of execution sales is whether the district court committed an abuse of discretion. Lutz v. Schmillen, 915 P.2d 599,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Hearing required. —

Judgment debtor was denied due process of law when the district court, without the benefit of a hearing, denied the debtor's Objection to Sale of Property. Lutz v. Schmillen, 915 P.2d 599,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Norman v. Jirdon Agri Chems., Inc. (In re Cockreham), 84 B.R. 757, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Lyman v. Thorn, 24 Wyo. 326, 157 P. 887,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1916).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duties, rights and remedies between attorney and client where attorney purchased client's property at or through execution sale, 20 ALR2d 1280.

Time of conversion of real estate sold under and by court order, 66 ALR2d 1266.

Inadequacy of price as basis for setting aside execution or sheriff's sale — modern cases, 5 ALR4th 794.